North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-310.73.
Attainment of the remediation standards.

Compliance with the approved remediation standards is attained for a site or portion of a site when a remedial action plan approved by the Department has been implemented and applicable soil, groundwater, surface water, and air emission standards have
been attained. The remediation standards may be attained through a combination of remediation activities that can include treatment, removal, engineering, or institutional controls, except that the person conducting the remediation
may not demonstrate attainment of a remediation standard through the use of institutional controls that result in an incompatible use of the property relative to surrounding land uses. When the remedial action plan has been fully
implemented, the person conducting the remediation shall submit a final report to the Department, with notice to all local governments with taxing and land-use jurisdiction over the site, that demonstrates that the remedial action
plan has been fully implemented, that any land-use restrictions have been certified on an annual basis, and that the remediation standards have been attained. The final report shall be accompanied by a request that the Department
issue a determination that no further remediation beyond that specified in the approved remedial action plan is required.

The person conducting the remediation has the burden of demonstrating that the remedial action plan has been fully implemented and that the remediation standards have been attained in compliance with the requirements of this Part. The Department may require
a person who implements the remedial action plan to supply any additional information necessary for the Department to determine whether the remediation standards have been attained.

The Department shall review the final report, and, upon determining that the person conducting the remediation has completed remediation to the approved remediation standard and met all the requirements of the approved remedial action plan, the Department
shall issue a determination that no further remediation beyond that specified in the approved remedial action plan is required at the site. Once the Department has issued a no further action determination, the Department may require
additional remedial action by the responsible party only upon finding any of the following:

Monitoring, testing, or analysis of the site subsequent to the issuance of the no further action determination indicates that the remediation standards and objectives were not achieved or are not being maintained.

One or more of the conditions, restrictions, or limitations imposed on the site as part of the remediation have been violated.

Site monitoring or operation and maintenance activities that are required as part of the remedial action plan or no further action determination for the site are not adequately funded or are not adequately implemented.

A contaminant or hazardous substance release is discovered at the site that was not the subject of the remedial investigation report or the remedial action plan.

A material change in the facts known to the Department at the time the written no further action determination was issued, or new facts, cause the Department to find that further assessment or remediation is necessary to prevent a significant risk to
human health and safety or to the environment.

The no further action determination was based on fraud, misrepresentation, or intentional nondisclosure of information by the person conducting the remediation, or that person’s agents, contractors, or affiliates.

Installation or use of wells would induce the flow of contaminated groundwater off the contaminated site, as defined in the remedial action plan.

The Department shall issue a final decision on a request for a determination that remediation has been completed to approved standards and that no further remediation beyond that specified in the approved remedial action plan is required within 180 days
after receipt of a complete final report. Failure of the Department to issue a final decision on a no further remediation determination within 180 days after receipt of a complete final report and request for a determination of
no further remediation may be treated as a denial of the request for a no further remediation determination. The responsible person may seek review of a denial of a request for a release from further remediation as provided in
Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.
2011-186, s. 2; 2015-286, s. 4.7(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.7(a), effective October 22, 2015, rewrote the second sentence of subsection (a); added “or that person’s agents, contractors, or affiliates” at the end of subdivision (c)(6); and substituted “contaminated site, as defined in
the remedial action plan” for “site” at the end of subdivision (c)(7).

§ 130A-310.73A.
Remediation of sites with off-site migration of contaminants.

Contaminated sites at which contamination has migrated to off-site properties may be remediated pursuant to this Part consistent with the remediation standards set out in

G.S. 130A-310.68

if either of the following occur:

The person who proposes to conduct the remediation pursuant to this Part remediates the contaminated off-site property to unrestricted use standards.

The person who proposes to conduct the remediation pursuant to this Part (i) provides the owner of the contaminated off-site property with a copy of this Part and the publication produced by the Department pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and
(ii) obtains written consent from the owner of the contaminated off-site property for the person to remediate the contaminated off-site property using site-specific remediation standards pursuant to this Part; provided
that the site-specific remediation standards shall not allow concentrations of contaminants on the off-site property to increase above the levels present on the date the written consent is obtained. Written consent from
the owner of the off-site property shall be on a form prescribed by the Department and include an affirmation that the owner has received and read the publication and authorizes the person to remediate the owner’s property
using site-specific remediation standards pursuant to this Part.

In order to inform owners of contaminated off-site property of the issues and liabilities associated with the contamination on their property, the Department, in consultation with the Consumer Protection Division of the North Carolina Department of Justice
and the North Carolina Real Estate Commission, shall develop and make available a publication entitled “Contaminated Property: Issues and Liabilities” to provide information on the nature of risk-based remediation and how it differs
from remediation to unrestricted use standards, potential health impacts that may arise from residual contamination, as well as identification of liabilities that arise from contaminated property and associated issues, including
potential impacts to real estate transactions and real estate financing. The Department shall update the publication as necessary.

If, after issuance of a no further action determination, the Department determines that additional remedial action is required for a contaminated off-site property pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.73(c)

, the responsible party shall be liable for the additional remediation deemed necessary.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude or impair any person from obtaining any and all other remedies allowed by law.

History.
2015-286, s. 4.7(a).

§ 130A-310.74.
Compliance with other laws.

Where a site is covered by an agreement under the Brownfields Property Reuse Act of 1997, as codified as Part 5 of Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes, any work performed by the prospective developer pursuant to that agreement is not required
to comply with this Part, but any work not covered by such agreement and performed at the site by another person not a party to that agreement may be performed pursuant to this Part.

History.
2011-186, s. 2.

§ 130A-310.75.
Use of registered environmental consultants.

The Department may approve the use of a registered environmental consultant to provide oversight for the assessment and remediation of a site under this Part based on the risk posed by the site and the availability of Department staff for oversight of
remediation activities. If remediation under this Part is not undertaken voluntarily, the Department may not require the use of a registered environmental consultant to provide oversight for the assessment and remediation of a site
under this Part.

History.
2011-186, s. 2; 2015-286, s. 4.7(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.7(a), effective October 22, 2015, added “based on the risk posed by the site and the availability of Department staff for oversight of remediation activities” at the end of the first sentence.

§ 130A-310.76.
Fees; permissible uses of fees.

The following fees, payable to the Risk-Based Remediation Fund established under

G.S. 130A-310.76

A, are applicable to activities under this Part:

Application fee. — A person who proposes to conduct remediation pursuant to this Part shall pay an application fee due at the time a proposed remedial action plan is submitted to the Department for approval. The application fee shall not exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000) for each acre or portion of an acre of contamination, including any area that will become contaminated as a result of the release; however, no person shall be required to pay more than one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) in fees attributable to this subdivision to the Fund, with the total amount owed calculated by the Department after evaluation of the factors set forth in subsection (a1) of this section and any rules
promulgated thereunder.

Oversight fee. — A person who has been approved by the Department to conduct a remedial action plan pursuant to this Part shall pay an oversight fee to the Department within 30 days of such approval or at such other time as the Department may authorize.
The total ongoing oversight fees shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each acre or portion of an acre of contamination, including any area that will become contaminated as a result of the release; however,
no person shall be required to pay more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in fees attributable to this subdivision to the Fund, with the total amount owed calculated by the Department after evaluation of the factors
set forth in subsection (a1) of this section and any rules promulgated thereunder.

(a1) The Department shall take all of the following factors into account prior to imposing a fee on a person pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and provide the person written documentation of the Department’s findings with respect to each factor
at the time the fee is imposed:

(1) The size of the site subject to a proposed remedial action plan.

(2) Whether groundwater contamination from the site has migrated, or is likely to migrate, to off-site properties.

The complexity of the work to be conducted at a site under a proposed remedial action plan.

The resources that the Department will need to evaluate and oversee the work to be conducted at a site under a proposed remedial action plan and the resources the Department will need to monitor a site after completion of remediation. If such work, or
any portion thereof, is to be performed by a registered environmental consultant in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 130A-310.75

, the Department shall take this into account accordingly in imposing a reduced fee.

Funds collected pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may be used only for the following purposes:

To pay for administrative and operating expenses necessary to implement this Part, including the full cost of the Department’s activities associated with any human health or ecological risk assessments, groundwater modeling, financial assurance matters,
or community outreach.

To establish, administer, and maintain a system for the tracking of land-use restrictions recorded at sites that are remediated pursuant to this Part.

The Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Environmental Review Commission, and the Fiscal Research Division on or before October 1 of each year on the amounts and sources
of funds collected by year received pursuant to this Part, the amounts and sources of those funds paid into the Risk-Based Remediation Fund established under

G.S. 130A-310.76

A, the number of acres of contamination for which funds have been received pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, and a detailed annual accounting of how the funds collected pursuant to this Part have been utilized
by the Department to advance the purposes of this Part.

The Commission may adopt rules to implement the requirements of subsection (a1) of this section.

History.
2011-186, s. 2; 2015-286, s. 4.7(a); 2017-57, s. 14.1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.7(a), effective October 22, 2015, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 14.1(a), effective July 1, 2017, substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources” for “Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations” in subsection (c).

§ 130A-310.76A.
Risk-Based Remediation Fund.

There is established under the control and direction of the Department the Risk-Based Remediation Fund. This fund shall be a revolving fund consisting of fees collected pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.76

and other monies paid to it or recovered by or on behalf of the Department. The Risk-Based Remediation Fund shall be treated as a nonreverting special trust fund pursuant to

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

, except that interest and other income received on the Fund balance shall be treated as set forth in G.S. 147-69.1(d).

History.
2015-286, s. 4.7(a).

§ 130A-310.77.
Construction of Part.

This Part shall not be construed or implemented in any of the following ways:

In any manner that would jeopardize federal authorization under any of the federal statutes, programs, or requirements set out in

G.S. 130A-310.67(a)

or would otherwise conflict with federal authority under those statutes, programs, and requirements. This Part is supplemental to the programs and requirements set out in

G.S. 130A-310.67(a)

that would otherwise govern the remediation of a contaminated industrial site. Where the definitions, provisions, or requirements of this Part conflict with the definitions, provisions, or requirements of an otherwise
applicable remediation program, this Part shall control, unless expressly stated to the contrary.

To limit the authority of the Department to require investigation, initial response, or remediation of environmental contamination under any other provision of State or federal law necessary to address an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare
or the environment.

To alter the requirements of programs to prevent or mitigate the release or discharge of contaminants to the environment, including permitting requirements that regulate the handling of hazardous substances or wastes.

To supersede or otherwise affect or prevent the enforcement of any land-use or development regulation or ordinance adopted by a municipality pursuant to Article 19 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes or adopted by a county pursuant to Article 18 of
Chapter 153A of the General Statutes. The use of a site and any land-use restrictions imposed as part of a remedial action plan shall comply with land-use and development controls adopted by a municipality pursuant to Article 19
of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes or adopted by a county pursuant to Article 18 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes.

History.
2011-186, s. 2.

§§ 130A-310.78 through 130A-310.80.

Reserved for future codification purposes.